Utah statutes.
72-11-211.    Passenger ropeways -- Inspection.
(1)  The committee may order inspections of the design, construction,
operation, and maintenance of passenger ropeways as the committee may
reasonably require.
(2)  If, as the result of an inspection, it is found that a violation of the
committee's rules exists, or a condition in passenger ropeway construction,
operation, or maintenance exists that endangers the safety of the public, an
immediate report shall be made to the operator whose passenger ropeway has
received the inspection and to the committee for appropriate investigation and
order.
(3)  A private residence passenger ropeway is not subject to the inspection
requirements under this section.
